Oklahoma, session 2026, HB1691.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 404.4 of Title 10, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
The Department of Human Services shall work with the State Fire
Marshal to develop guidelines that allow family child care homes and
large child care homes to operate under the fire protection
requirements of the International Residential Code (IRC). Family
child care homes and large child care homes shall not be denied a
license to operate should they comply with the requirements of the
IRC. No agency, municipality, county, or other political
subdivision of this state shall place stricter fire requirements
Req. No. 11762 Page 1

than those outlined in the IRC on family child care homes and large
child care homes.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.

60-1-11762 MJ 01/03/25



















Req. No. 11762 Page 2